Missouri, session 2026, HB2582.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 208, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 208.203, to read as follows:
208.203. 1. The MO HealthNet division shall expedite a verification for each
MO HealthNet benefits application that the applicant is not currently enrolled in any
other state's Medicaid program or in any qualified health plan offered through a health
benefit exchange established under the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, 42
U.S.C. Section 18001 et seq. An applicant relocating from an uncooperative state may
be asked to provide a certificate of nonenrollment from that state.
2. Any applicant for MO HealthNet benefits currently enrolled in a program or
plan described in subsection 1 of this section may terminate his or her enrollment to
become eligible for MO HealthNet benefits. The division shall not approve the
application for MO HealthNet benefits until the termination of enrollment in the other
program or plan is effective.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.